nl: Media > Boeken: Audioboeken; E-boeken; Gedrukte boeken
cs: Média > Knihy: Audioknihy; E-knihy; Tištěné knihy
th: สื่อ > หนังสือ: หนังสือเสียง; หนังสืออิเล็กทรอนิกส์; หนังสือเป็นรูปเล่ม
zh-TW: 媒體 > 書籍: 有聲書; 電子書; 印刷書
vi: Truyền thông > Sách: Sách nói; Sách điện tử; Sách in
it: Media > Libri: Audiolibri; E-Book; Libri fisici
zh-CN: 媒体 > 书籍: 有声读物; 电子书; 印刷书
nb: Medier > Bøker: Lydbøker; E-bøker; Trykte bøker
ru: Медиаконтент > Книги: Аудиокниги; Электронные книги; Печатные книги
pt-PT: Multimédia > Livros: Audiolivro; Livro eletrónico; Livros impressos
sk-SK: Médiá > Knihy: Audioknihy; Elektronické knihy; Vytlačené knihy
fi: Media > Kirjat: Äänikirjat; E-kirjat; Printtikirjat
de: Medien > Bücher: Hörbücher; E-Books; Gedruckte Bücher
ja: メディア > 書籍: オーディオブック; 電子書籍; 印刷書籍
hu: Média > Könyvek: Hangoskönyvek; E-könyvek; Nyomtatott könyvek
ko: 미디어 > 도서: 오디오북; 전자책; 종이책
tr: Medya > Kitaplar: Sesli Kitaplar; E-kitaplar; Basılı Kitaplar
da: Medier > Bøger: Lydbøger; E-bøger; Trykte bøger
fr: Médias > Livres: Livres audio; E-livres; Livres imprimés
bg-BG: Медия > Книги: Аудиокниги; Електронни книги; Печатни книги
hr-HR: Mediji > Knjige: Audioknjige; E-knjige; Tiskane knjige
el: Μέσα ενημέρωσης > Βιβλία: Ηχητικά βιβλία; E-Books; Έντυπα βιβλία
sv: Media > Böcker: Ljudböcker; E-böcker; Tryckta böcker
ro-RO: Media > Cărți: Cărți audio; Cărți electronice; Cărți tipărite
en: Media > Books: Audiobooks; E-Books; Print Books
es: Multimedia > Libros: Audiolibros; Libros electrónicos; Libros impresos
lt-LT: Medija > Knygos: Garsinės knygos; Elektroninės knygos; Spausdintos knygas
pt-BR: Mídia > Livros: Audiolivros; E-books; Livros impressos
sl-SI: Mediji > Knjige: Zvočne knjige; E-knjige; Tiskane knjige
pl: Media > Książki: Audiobooki; E-booki; Książki drukowane